Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1110
Qualified equity investment, defined.

(1) Qualified equity investment means any equity investment in, or long-term debt security issued by, a qualified community development entity that:

(a) Is acquired after January 1, 2012, at its original issuance solely in exchange for cash;

(b) Has at least eighty-five percent, or one hundred percent with respect to the 2021 allocation, of its cash purchase price used by the issuer to make qualified low-income community investments in qualified active low-income community businesses located in this state by the first anniversary of the initial credit allowance date;

(c) Is designated by the issuer as a qualified equity investment and, with respect to awards of the 2021 allocation pursuant to subsection (6) of section 77-1116, is designated by the issuer as a qualified equity investment under section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and

(d) Is certified by the Tax Commissioner as not exceeding the limitation contained in section 77-1115.

(2) The term includes any qualified equity investment that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (1)(a) of this section if such investment was a qualified equity investment in the hands of a prior holder.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 10;

Laws 2021, LB682, § 4.